Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1103.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6102 of Title 7 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 6102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Discount points." Fees knowingly paid by the consumer for the purpose of reducing, and which in fact result in a bona fide reduction of, the interest rate or time-price differential applicable to the mortgage.123456789101112131415161718 * * *Section 2. Section 6122(a)(1) of Title 7 is amended to read:§ 6122. Powers conferred on certain licensees engaged in the mortgage loan business.(a) Mortgage lenders.--If they are in compliance with the provisions of this chapter, mortgage lenders shall have the power and authority:(1) To make first and secondary mortgage loans and, subject to the limitations of this chapter, to charge and collect interest, points, discount points, origination fees and delinquency charges for the loans.* * *Section 3. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeals under paragraphs (2) and (3) are necessary to effectuate the addition of the definition of "discount points" in 7 Pa.C.S. § 6102 and the amendment of 7 Pa.C.S. § 6122(a)(1).(2) The definition of "discount points" in section 101 of the act of January 30, 1974 (P.L.13, No.6), referred to as the Loan Interest and Protection Law, is repealed.(3) Section 402 of the Loan Interest and Protection Law is repealed.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1103PN1658 - 2 - <--1234567891011121314151617181920212223